Utah statutes.
23-25-5.   Procedure for home state.

(1) (a)  Upon receipt of a report from the licensing authority of the issuing state reporting the failure of a violator to comply with the term of a citation, the licensing authority of the home state shall:

(i)  notify the violator;

(ii)  initiate a suspension action in accordance with the home state's suspension procedures; and

(iii)  suspend the violator's license privileges until satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the wildlife citation has been furnished by the issuing state to the home state licensing authority.

(b)  Due process safeguards will be accorded.

(2)  Upon receipt of a report of conviction from the licensing authority of the issuing state, the licensing authority of the home state shall enter the conviction as though it occurred in the home state for the purposes of the suspension of license privileges.

(3)  The licensing authority of the home state shall:

(a)  maintain a record of actions taken; and

(b)  make reports to issuing states as provided in the compact manual.

